Massachusetts, session 194th, S567.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 3 of chapter 132B of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by striking paragraph 5 and inserting in place thereof, the following
paragraph:-
The board, in addition to other powers conferred in this chapter, shall advise the
commissioner of food and agriculture with respect to the implementation and administration of
this chapter. The commissioner of food and agriculture shall consult and concur with the
commissioner of environmental protection and commissioner of public health when rendering a
decision under section 13 of this chapter, relative to the protection of groundwater sources of
drinking water from pesticide contamination.
of 1